Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
PUBLIC MALL ACT OF 1970

31-25-401. Short title.

This part 4 shall be known and may be cited as the "Public Mall Act of 1970".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1181, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-401 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-402. Legislative declaration - powers.

The general assembly finds and declares that, in certain areas in municipalities and particularly in retail shopping areas thereof, there is need to separate pedestrian travel from vehicular travel and that such separation is necessary to protect the public safety or otherwise to serve the public interest and convenience. The general assembly further finds and declares that such objective can be accomplished, in part, by the establishment of pedestrian malls.

The powers granted in this subsection (2) shall be exercised by the governing body in accordance with the terms of this part 4 and in the same manner as is otherwise provided by law. The governing body of a municipality has the power:

To establish pedestrian malls;

To prohibit, in whole or in part, vehicular traffic on a pedestrian mall, which power shall be in addition to and not by way of a limitation upon the power granted or held by governing bodies under other laws, and this paragraph (b) is not intended to limit powers already held by governing bodies to deal with their public rights-of-way;

To acquire, by gift, purchase, eminent domain, or otherwise, all types of interest in real property and rights-of-way, together with improvements, which will become part of a pedestrian mall or which will otherwise be used by the municipality as part of or for purposes connected with a pedestrian mall, and such land, real property, or rights-of-way may be improved in the same manner as municipal streets may be improved under paragraph (e) of this subsection (2); to retain title to the pedestrian mall or to convey, lease, or transfer the pedestrian mall, in whole or in part, on such terms as it deems advisable, to an improvement district or other body or agency; and to deal with it generally in any manner which it deems appropriate so long as it is used for public purposes and in the public interest;

To construct or ensure the construction of, through an improvement district or other appropriate body or agency, on municipal streets which have been or will be established as a pedestrian mall or on all types of interest in real property and rights-of-way described under paragraph (c) of this subsection (2), improvements of any kind or nature necessary or convenient to the operation of such municipal streets or interests in real property and rights-of-way as a pedestrian mall;

To make such improvements as are authorized under paragraph (d) of this subsection (2) on municipal streets adjacent to or near the pedestrian mall and other improvements as are necessary or convenient to the operation of the mall;

To pay, from general funds of the municipality, from proceeds of general obligation bonds, from other moneys available to the municipality, from the proceeds of assessments levied on lands benefited by the establishment of a pedestrian mall, from funds raised through bonds issued thereagainst, or from any other source whatsoever, the damages, if any, allowed or awarded to any property owner by reason of the establishment of a pedestrian mall and to make adequate provisions to secure the payment of said moneys as provided in section 31-25-406;

To pay, from general funds of the municipality, from proceeds of general obligation bonds, from other moneys available to the municipality, from the proceeds of assessments levied on property benefited by any such improvements, from funds raised through bonds issued payable from such assessments, or from any other source whatsoever, the whole or any portion of the cost of such improvements;

To levy assessments against properties benefited by the proposed pedestrian mall in an amount no greater than the total damages or compensation paid to landowners or to assess such damages as part of the total cost of the improvements made in the mall area, so long as the amount assessed does not exceed the special benefits conferred;

To issue special assessment bonds in anticipation of the collection of special assessments payable in installments or to be levied at annual intervals over a designated term and to additionally secure the payment of such bonds by or from a source otherwise provided by law;

To do any and all other acts or things necessary or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of this part 4.

The acquisitions and improvements authorized in paragraphs (c) and (e) of subsection (2) of this section shall be deemed improvements as such term or a related term is used in this part 4. The governing body shall also have the power to transfer, lease, and convey, on such terms as it deems advisable, all such improvements and interests in real property.

This part 4 and all of its provisions shall be liberally construed to the end that its purposes may be effectuated. Any proceeding taken pursuant to this part 4 shall not be invalid for failure to comply with the provisions of this part 4 if the acts done and proceedings taken are in substantial compliance with the terms and provisions set forth in this part 4.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1181, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-402 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-403. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Improvements" means improvements of any kind or nature necessary or convenient to the operation of municipal streets as a pedestrian mall, including but not limited to paving, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, sewers, drainage works, street lighting facilities, fire protection facilities, flood protection facilities, water distribution facilities, ponds, lakes, vehicular parking areas, retaining walls, landscaping, tree planting, statuaries, fountains, commercial buildings and facilities, decorative structures, benches, rest rooms, child care facilities, display facilities, information booths, public assembly facilities, and other structures, works, or improvements necessary or convenient to serve members of the public using such pedestrian mall and including the reconstruction or relocation of existing municipally-owned works, improvements, or facilities on such municipal streets.

"Intersecting street" means any street which meets or crosses a pedestrian mall at a mall intersection but includes only those portions thereof on either side of a mall intersection which lie between the mall intersection and the first intersection of the intersecting street with a municipal street or highway open to vehicular traffic. If any portion of a pedestrian mall terminates on a street at a place thereon other than a place of intersection with a municipal street or state highway open to vehicular traffic, "intersecting street" also includes that portion of any street which lies between such place of termination and the first intersection of such street with a municipal street or state highway open to vehicular traffic. "Intersecting street" also includes any other street or portion thereof which the governing body, in a measure duly adopted as provided in this part 4, declares to be such.

"Mall intersection" means any intersection of a municipal street which constitutes a part of a pedestrian mall with any other street, which intersection is itself part of the pedestrian mall.

"Municipal street" means a street which exists within the municipal boundaries of a municipality except those designated as state highways by a duly constituted authority. If a state highway is contemplated to be used as part of a pedestrian mall, the transportation commission is authorized to remove the classification of a state highway from such part to be used as a pedestrian mall and to cede complete jurisdiction to the municipality by resolution duly adopted if it is satisfied that satisfactory provisions for the routing of traffic through the municipality can be provided by an alternate route or that the part of the state highway proposed for a pedestrian mall is no longer necessary for state highway purposes.

"Public mall", referred to in this part 4 as "pedestrian mall", means one or more municipal streets or portions thereof on which vehicular traffic is or is to be restricted in whole or in part and which is or is to be used exclusively or primarily for pedestrian travel, although such mall may have other improvements constructed upon it for appearance and utility.

"Streets", as used in the definitions of the terms "municipal street", "mall intersection", and "intersecting street" in this section, means any public street, road, highway, alley, lane, sidewalk, right-of-way, court, way, or place of any nature open to the use of the public and held by the public for street and road purposes, whether the same was acquired in fee or by grant of dedication or easement or by adverse use.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1182, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(4) amended, p. 1069, § 42, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-403 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-404. Resolution of intention.

When the governing body determines that the public interest and convenience require the establishment of a pedestrian mall and that vehicular traffic will not be unduly inconvenienced thereby, it may adopt a resolution declaring its intention to establish such pedestrian mall. Such resolution shall contain:

The determination and declaration referred to in the introductory portion of this subsection (1);

A general description of the municipality's streets or portions thereof which are proposed to be established as a pedestrian mall;

A general description of the mall intersections;

A general description of the intersecting streets;

A statement that the governing body proposes to adopt an ordinance prohibiting, in whole or in part, vehicular traffic on such pedestrian mall. If vehicular traffic is proposed to be prohibited only in part, the resolution shall also contain a general statement of the exceptions proposed to be made. Such exceptions may include exceptions in favor of public, emergency, utility, and other classes of vehicles, may include exceptions in favor of all or certain classes of vehicles during certain days or during portions of days, and may include other exceptions of any kind or nature.

A general statement of the source of moneys proposed to be used to pay damages, if any, allowed or awarded to any abutting property owner by reason of the establishment of the pedestrian mall and how and when it is anticipated that such sum will be paid;

Provision for a notice fixing a day, hour, and place for a public hearing by the governing body relative to the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall. The notice shall also contain a statement that oral presentations from abutting property owners and the public at large in favor of or opposing, objecting to, or protesting the proposed pedestrian mall will be considered by the governing body at the public hearing.

A statement that any person owning or having any legal or equitable interest in any real property which might suffer legal damage by reason of the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall shall file a written claim of damages, if any damages are to be considered or allowed, with the clerk at any time prior to the first reading of the ordinance establishing the pedestrian mall.

In such resolution any street may be described by reference thereto by its lawful or official name or the name by which it is commonly known, and the pedestrian mall, the mall intersections, and the intersecting streets may be described by reference to a map or plat thereof on file in the office of the clerk in order that the description is sufficient for one to ascertain which streets and parts of streets are in fact within the proposed mall.

If the governing body intends, at any time in the future, through appropriate action, to levy assessments on lands benefited by the establishment of the mall to help pay the compensation or damages allowed to property owners, a statement to such effect shall be included in the resolution.

If the governing body, in connection with the initial establishment of a pedestrian mall, proposes improvements and a method for paying for the same, the resolution shall also contain statements to satisfy the requirements of applicable law for special assessment districts, improvement districts, or other governmental bodies or agencies or private nonprofit corporations selected to accomplish and pay for the improvements.

If the governing body foresees improvements being made to the pedestrian mall in the future, a statement shall be included as to how the governing body anticipates the same shall be accomplished and paid for.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1183, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-404 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-405. Notice and hearing.

The resolution of intention shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation published within the county or municipality as the case may be. It shall be published three times: Once less than seventy-five days but more than sixty days prior to the date of the hearing; once less than forty-five days but more than thirty days prior to the date of the hearing; and once less than fifteen days but more than ten days prior to the date of the hearing. In a municipality where no such newspaper is published, the resolution shall instead be so published in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the municipality is located.

Copies of the resolution shall be prepared for posting and for this purpose shall be headed "Notice of Intention to Establish a Pedestrian Mall", the heading to be in letters at least one-half inch in height. Such copies shall be posted not less than sixty days prior to the hearing, and good faith efforts shall be made to maintain the posted copies in existence to the hearing date. These copies of the resolution shall be posted approximately three hundred feet apart, located as follows:

On or near all municipal streets or portions thereof proposed to be established as a pedestrian mall;

On all intersecting streets;

On all streets that are proposed to be left open and which lie within the mall area if, in fact, the area is to be circumscribed by streets to be closed.

A copy of the resolution shall be mailed by registered mail with return receipt requested, not less than sixty days prior to the hearing date, to each person owning of record all or any part of a fee interest or holding an encumbrance of record against any of such lands abutting the proposed mall and, if the mall closes, to all property owners of record and those who hold encumbrances of record within the area so circumscribed. The copies shall be sent to the last known addresses of such owners and encumbrancers.

The governing body may determine that such resolution shall also be mailed to such other persons as it deems should be notified in accordance with the procedures in this section.

The governing body, not less than sixty days prior to the date of the hearing, shall cause to be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the said properties are located a statement including the names of the parties to whom such notices have been sent and a general description of the property which the notice concerns so that any party receiving or acquiring an interest in such property between the date of the sending of the notice and the date of the hearing shall be put on notice as to the nature of the proceeding and that his claim or protest, if any, shall be filed with the governing body in accordance with the provisions of this part 4. A copy of the resolution shall be attached to the recorded document.

At or before the hearing, any interested person may, severally or with others, file with the clerk a document in writing either supporting, opposing, objecting to, or protesting the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall. The same may be withdrawn at any time by written notice of such withdrawal signed by the persons who signed the original document, or any person who signed the original document may have his name stricken from such document. Such notice of withdrawal shall be filed with the clerk within the time set forth in this subsection (5) with the same effect as if said written document had never been filed.

At the hearing the governing body shall receive the written objections and written protests to the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall. The governing body shall also receive oral presentations from abutting property owners and the public at large in favor of or opposing, objecting to, or protesting the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall. The hearing may be continued from time to time by order entered on the minutes.

If the owners of lands abutting the proposed pedestrian mall representing a majority of the frontage on the proposed pedestrian mall have made written objection or written protest to the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall, the governing body shall so find. In the event of such finding, the governing body may terminate the proceedings for such establishment or continue the proceedings in order to put the question of the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall to a vote of the registered electors of the municipality. If such question is put to a vote of the registered electors of the municipality and a majority of those voting thereon vote in favor of establishing such proposed pedestrian mall, the governing body may go forward to establish the proposed pedestrian mall in accordance with the provisions of this part 4, but all costs and expenses of establishing the pedestrian mall shall be paid by the municipality, and no special assessment shall be levied against the owners of lands abutting the pedestrian mall unless levied against all real property within the municipality. If the majority of those voting thereon vote against establishing such proposed pedestrian mall, the governing body shall terminate the proceedings. In the event proceedings are terminated, no proceeding shall again be commenced for the establishment of the same or substantially the same pedestrian mall until the expiration of one year from the date of termination.

In the event a majority written protest or written objection is not filed, the judgment of the governing body, if it establishes the proposed pedestrian mall, shall be final and conclusive. In the event a majority written protest or written objection is filed, the judgment of the governing body, if it establishes the proposed pedestrian mall, shall be final and conclusive only if an election is held and if the result thereof complies with the provisions of subsection (6) of this section.

If it is determined to establish the pedestrian mall, a resolution to that effect shall be adopted by the governing body. If the governing body at that time or at a later time determines that the pedestrian mall shall not be established, no claim for damages or compensation shall be allowed to any extent whatsoever.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1184, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-405 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-406. Claims for damages or compensation.

Any person owning, or having any legal or equitable interest in, any real property which might suffer legal damage by reason of the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall shall file, prior to the first reading of the ordinance establishing the pedestrian mall, a written claim for damages with the clerk. Such written claim shall describe the real property as to which the claim is made, shall state the exact nature of the claimant's interest therein, shall state the exact nature of and grounds for the claimed damage thereto, and shall state the amount of damages claimed. The failure to file such written claim within the time provided in this subsection (1) is a waiver of any claim for damages or compensation and shall operate as a complete bar to any subsequent action seeking to prevent the establishment of said pedestrian mall or to recover damages on account of such establishment, and, in the event a claim is filed, such filing shall operate as a complete bar in any subsequent action for the recovery of any damages or compensation in excess of the amount stated in such claim. Any such claim may be withdrawn by the claimant at any time by written withdrawal with the same effect as if it had never been filed. The governing body shall receipt for the claims that have been filed in accordance with this section for damages or compensation from the establishment of the proposed mall.

The governing body may allow any claim for damages made pursuant to this section. Any claim so allowed shall be for the full amount of damages claimed in the written claim; except that the governing body, with the written consent of the claimant, may allow a claim for a lesser amount. In the event the claim is not allowed in full, or a suitable lesser amount is not agreed upon between the claimant and the governing body, or the governing body refuses to recognize the claim, the claimant or the governing body, through its legal counsel, may institute proceedings in court to ascertain the amount, if any, due the claimant; however, in no event shall an action be instituted later than two years after the date the claim has been denied. Any amount determined to be due to the claimant shall accrue interest at six percent per annum from the date that vehicular traffic is prohibited, in whole or in part, on the pedestrian mall, which closing in fact is the act from which the claimed damages arise.

Before vehicular traffic is prohibited, in whole or in part, on the pedestrian mall, the governing body or another agency to which it is intended the mall will be conveyed shall pay the amounts allowed or enter into agreements with good and sufficient surety to pay the principal amounts allowed or, in the event the claim is to be litigated, an amount which the court determines is sufficient to pay the compensation in that behalf when ascertained. The required surety bond may be waived in writing by the claimant.

Those lawsuits instituted to determine the amount of damages, if any, to be allowed shall be in the nature of a proceeding in eminent domain for the condemnation of the right in real property, the taking of which by the establishment of the pedestrian mall results in the damages claimed. The complaint shall in no way be construed as an admission that the rights in fact exist or that damages or compensation are due therefor. The court shall first determine the nature of the right in real property, if any, being taken. Such proceedings shall then be governed under the applicable statutes and proceedings of articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S., except as otherwise provided by this part 4.

Nothing in this part 4 shall be construed or interpreted as creating any new right in any person to damages or compensation by reason of the establishment of a pedestrian mall, it being the intention of the general assembly in enacting this part 4 to provide an orderly method for the determination and payment only of such damages and compensation as are required under the constitutions of the state of Colorado and the United States. In this connection, the general assembly expressly declares that, to the extent to which the establishment of a pedestrian mall is justifiable as an exercise of the police power for which no compensation is constitutionally required, no damages or compensation shall be allowed in any action.

The general assembly expressly declares that the establishment of a pedestrian mall and the prohibition of vehicular traffic, in whole or in part, is a legislative act and within the discretion of the governing body except to the extent which may otherwise be provided in this part 4.

Once the pedestrian mall has been established in accordance with the provisions of this part 4, the nature of the title held by the governing body shall be deemed a fee simple.

In the event the governing body vacates the pedestrian mall or any part thereof by official act and such pedestrian mall or part thereof is not designated by the governing body to revert to a public street, the real property thereby vacated shall vest in abutting landowners in the same manner as if a public street were being vacated.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1186, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-406 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For vacation of public streets, see part 3 of article 2 of title 43.

31-25-407. Establishment of the mall.

Not later than one hundred eighty days following the adoption of the resolution establishing the pedestrian mall as provided in this part 4, the governing body may adopt on first reading an ordinance finally establishing the pedestrian mall. Such ordinance shall contain:

A general description of the pedestrian mall and a declaration and determination that the same is established. The mall as finally established shall be substantially the same as or any portion of that described in the resolution of intention.

Rules and regulations prohibiting vehicular traffic on such pedestrian mall subject to such exceptions as the ordinance may provide. Such rules and regulations and such exceptions are to follow substantially those statements made in the resolution of intention.

Such additional rules and regulations as the governing body may determine pertaining to the interpretation, operation, and enforcement of the rules and regulations promulgated under paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) and otherwise pertaining to the use, operation, maintenance, and control of the pedestrian mall;

Such provisions as the governing body deems necessary pertaining to the effective date of any such rules or regulations.

Such ordinance shall be adopted and published and shall take effect in the manner provided by law or charter for ordinances of the municipality.

Such ordinance shall be subject to referendum in the same manner as other ordinances of the municipality. The pedestrian mall shall not be closed to vehicular traffic, in whole or in part, under such ordinance until all claims for damages have been paid or properly secured as provided in this part 4.

Proceedings under this part 4 and the adoption of such ordinance notwithstanding, the municipality and its governing body shall retain its police powers and other rights and powers relating to the municipal streets and rights-of-way constituting a part of the pedestrian mall. No action taken pursuant to this part 4 shall be interpreted or construed to be a vacation or abandonment, in whole or in part, of any municipal street or any right therein, it being intended that the establishment of a pedestrian mall pursuant to this part 4 be a matter of appropriate additional regulation only.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or construed to prevent the municipality and its governing body, at any time subsequent to the adoption of the ordinance provided for in this part 4, from abandoning the operation of the pedestrian mall, from changing the extent of the pedestrian mall, or from changing or repealing any of the rules and regulations pertaining to the pedestrian mall; but any substantial change made after the adoption of the ordinance provided for in this section will create potential liability for new or additional claims which could not have been foreseen prior to the date of the hearing on the original establishment of the pedestrian mall.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1188, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-407 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For validation and time for taking effect of ordinances and resolutions, see §§ 31-16-104 and 31-16-105.

31-25-408. Improvement of the pedestrian mall.

The municipality and its governing body may provide for the construction of and payment for improvements on the pedestrian mall through an improvement district under part 6 of this article, or by creation of an improvement district which can levy special assessments under other authority, or by other lawful means. The cost of the improvements shall be the cost of construction and may include the damages or compensation paid to obtain the mall area. The municipality may also pay all or any part of the cost of improving a pedestrian mall from its general funds or from any other source of moneys available to it.

A pedestrian mall established or to be established pursuant to this part 4 may be so improved either concurrently with the proceedings taken under this part 4 for the establishment of a pedestrian mall or at any time subsequent thereto, but no contract for the work or any improvement shall be awarded until the claims for damages or compensation for establishing the mall have been fully paid or properly secured as provided in this part 4.

The governing body may combine any part of the proceedings taken pursuant to this part 4 with any part of the proceedings taken under any law allowing for the assessment of and payment of the damages and for the construction of and payment for improvements to the end that duplication of ordinances, resolutions, notices, hearings, and other acts or proceedings may be avoided.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1188, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-408 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-409. Special ad valorem assessments.

As used in this section, "district" means the district within which lie the lands deemed by the governing body to be specially benefited by the establishment of the pedestrian mall even though assessments may not be levied to pay for improvements.

Following the establishment of a pedestrian mall pursuant to this part 4 and annually on or before December 1 of each year, the governing body or other body or agency having jurisdiction or responsibility for the improvements may prepare and approve an estimate of the expenditures required during the ensuing fiscal year for the maintenance, operation, and repair of the pedestrian mall and shall deduct from such estimate the amount of revenues, if any, which the governing body estimates will accrue to the municipality during such year from the operation of the pedestrian mall.

The said governing body or agency may then through the levying authority levy and collect in any year upon and against all of the taxable land and improvements within the district a special ad valorem assessment sufficient to raise a sum of money to provide the net amount as so determined, but in no event shall the rate of assessment in any one year exceed one-half mill against the valuation for assessment of each property in the district as shown on the assessment roll used by the county for the municipal taxation. The levy shall be made with notice and hearing to all owners affected thereby. The limitation as set forth in this subsection (3) shall not be construed to limit in any manner the financing of improvements which may be erected in the mall area.

The special ad valorem assessment shall be levied, collected, and enforced at the same times, in the same manner, by the same officers, and with the same interest and penalties as in the case of general taxes levied by the municipality.

The proceeds of the assessment shall be placed in a separate fund by the said governing body or agency and shall be expended only for the maintenance, operation, repair, or improvement of the pedestrian mall.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1189, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-409 as it existed prior to 1975.